Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1204
Actions; where brought; process; judgments.

Concurrently with the filing of the declaration provided for by the terms of section 44-1203, the attorney shall file with the Department of Insurance an instrument in writing executed by him or her for said subscribers, conditioned that upon the issuance of certificate of authority provided for in section 44-1211 action may be brought in the county in which the property insured thereunder is situated and service of process may be had in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action in all suits in this state arising out of such policies, contracts, or agreements, which service shall be valid and binding upon all subscribers exchanging at any time reciprocal or interinsurance contracts through such attorney. Such instrument shall further provide that in all suits arising in this state on account of contracts issued by such attorney for the account of said subscribers, such action may be brought against such attorney as attorney in fact for all subscribers at such reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, and the judgment in the action shall be a judgment against and binding upon each of the subscribers, as their respective interests may appear.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 4, p. 460;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 4, p. 683;

C.S.1922, § 7972;

C.S.1929, § 44-1504;

R.S.1943, § 44-1204;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 61.